apertium-mal-eng_jan27/dev/manga.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- മാങ്ങ; മാങ്ങ; 16 -->
    <pardef n="മാങ്ങ__n">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>യെ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>യുടെ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>യ്ക്</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>യില്‍</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>യാല്‍</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>യേ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>യോട്</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>കള്‍</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>കളെ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>കളുടെ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>കള്‍കൂ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>കളില്‍</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>കളാല്‍</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>കളേ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>കളോടു</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">
    <e lm="മാങ്ങ"><i>മാങ്ങ</i><par n="മാങ്ങ__n"/></e>
  </section>
</dictionary>
